Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 6. Lighting Districts

§ 15-6-601.
Authorization; installation and maintenance costs.

The governing body of any city or town having a population of more than eight thousand (8,000) may create lighting districts in the business portions thereof embracing any street or avenue or portion thereof and abutting property and require the cost of installing the system to be paid by the owners of the property abutting upon a street or avenue within the district, including any street or other railway therein, and assess and collect the cost of the installation by special assessment against that property. The cost of maintenance of the lighting system shall be paid by the city or town at large.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 399; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-399; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Quoted

in

Mealey v. City of Laramie, 472 P.2d 787,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of municipal corporation for injury or death occurring from defects in, or negligence in construction, operation, or maintenance of its electric street-lighting equipment, apparatus, and the like, 19 ALR2d 344.

§ 15-6-602.
Assessments; proportion; limitation.

The entire cost of erecting and maintaining the posts shall be borne by the owners of property which abuts upon a street or avenue within the district. Each parcel of land so abutting shall be assessed in the proportion which the street frontage of the parcel bears to the street frontage of the entire district.

The owner of any street or other railway upon a street or avenue within the district shall be assessed for not more than one-sixth (1/6) of the entire cost and expense of the installation as the governing body determines.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 400; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-400; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-603.
Creation; contents of resolution; notice; hearing; installation and maintenance of posts.

If the governing body desires to create a special lighting district, it shall propose a resolution designating the number of the district and describing its boundaries. The resolution shall state the:

Character and number of posts to be erected;

Character of the lights to be maintained;

Estimate of the cost of posts and erection;

Proportion of the cost to be assessed against abutting property, including a street or other railway; and

Time the governing body will hear objections to the final adoption of the resolution.

The proposed resolution shall be published at least five (5) times in a daily newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, or in a weekly newspaper in four (4) issues, and written notice thereof shall be served upon the owner or owners, or agents of the abutting property. The first publication of the resolution shall be made and the written notices served not less than thirty (30) days before the date set for hearing objections.

Any owner or agent of any lot or parcel of land or property to be assessed within the district may appear in person or by counsel at the hearing and show cause, if any, why the district should not be created and lights installed and maintained as provided in this article. If objections are made to the creation of the district by owners or agents representing more than one-half (1/2) of the total number of lineal feet frontage of all the property which would be assessed to defray the cost of the installation, the district shall not be created. Not less than six (6) months thereafter a resolution for the same or similar purpose covering the same territory may again be considered after notice and proceedings as provided for consideration of the original resolution. If sufficient objections are not made, a majority of members of the governing body voting in its favor shall adopt the resolution.

The governing body, by contract, may procure and erect the posts required for the maintenance of the lights or require the street commissioner or other official of the city or town to do so in the manner in which the governing body provides. When the posts have been installed the governing body shall provide for the maintenance of the lights and pay the expense of the maintenance. All posts shall be of uniform size and character and be distributed uniformly upon the street or avenue or section thereof to be lighted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 401; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-401; Laws 1973, ch. 103, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-604.
Creation; assessment; contents; notice, hearing and objections; final resolution.

The governing body shall estimate the cost of erecting and furnishing the posts and on or before the first Monday in November of each year adopt a resolution levying and assessing all of the property embraced within the district with the entire cost of installing the lighting system. Each lot or parcel of land in the district shall be assessed for that part of the whole cost of the installation which its linear feet bordering the street, avenue or alley, bear to the total number of lineal feet abutting the streets, avenues or alleys included within the special district, and levying and assessing against any street or other railway upon a street or avenue or portion thereof included in the lighting district not to exceed one-sixth (1/6) of the total cost of installing the lighting system, as determined by the governing body. The resolution shall contain a list describing each lot or parcel of land, any street or other railway with the name of the owner thereof, if known, the linear number of feet fronting or abutting upon the street or avenue to be lighted or otherwise assessable and the amount levied thereon. The resolution shall be signed by the mayor and city clerk and kept on file in the clerk’s office.

A notice signed by the city clerk stating that the resolution levying the assessment to defray the cost of installing the lighting system is on file in his office, subject to inspection for a period of five (5) days, shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, and written notice thereof shall be served upon the owner or owners or agents of the abutting property. The notice shall state the time and place at which the governing body will hear objections to the final adoption of the resolution. The hearing shall not be less than five (5) days after publication of the notice.

At the time fixed, the governing body shall meet and hear all objections, and for that purpose may adjourn from day to day and may modify the resolution in whole or in part. A copy of the resolution as finally adopted and certified by the clerk must be delivered within two (2) days after its passage to the city treasurer. The treasurer, within five (5) days after the receipt thereof, by written notice, mailed or otherwise delivered, shall notify each owner of the property assessed of the amount of assessment, the purpose for which the levy is made, the tax against each lot or parcel of land and the date it becomes delinquent.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 402; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-402; Laws 1973, ch. 103, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-605.
Manner of maintaining and paying.

The lighting system in each district shall be maintained at the expense of the city or town by contract in the manner in which the governing body provides, and the cost thereof shall be paid out of the fund which the governing body designates.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 403, 404; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-403, 15.1-404; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-605

,

15-6-606

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-606.
Lien; creation; enforcement; when vitiated.

Any special assessment levied together with all costs and penalties constitute a lien upon the property assessed from the date of the final passage of the resolution levying the assessment. The lien may be enforced as provided by law for the enforcement of other liens.

No mistake in the description of the property or the name of the owner vitiates the liens unless it is impossible to identify the property from the description.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 405, 406; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-405, 15.1-406; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-607

,

15-6-608

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-607.
Existing remedies applicable.

All remedies, provisions and means provided by existing laws or by the ordinances of any city or town availing itself of the provisions of this article, for the correction of errors or omissions in the adoption of any resolution or proceeding, or in the levy of any assessment, or its collection, or for the enforcement of any levy by sale of the property against which any assessment is made, or for the redemption of property from sale, or otherwise applicable to the administration of this article are available the same as if they were made a part of this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 407; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-407; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-609

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-608.
Posts already installed.

If before the creation of any lighting district, posts conforming in size, character and location to the governing body’s requirements have been installed at the expense of any owners of property therein, the governing body may adopt those posts and out of the funds raised to defray the cost of obtaining and installing posts for the district, may pay the owners of the posts so adopted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 408; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-408; W.S. 1977, § 15-6-610; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-609.
Discontinuation.

If at any time after the creation of any special lighting district, a petition is presented to the governing body, signed by the owners or agents of more than one-half (1/2) of the total number of linear feet of the property fronting or abutting upon any street or avenue or portion thereof included within the district, asking that the district be discontinued, the governing body, by resolution, shall provide for discontinuing the maintenance and operation of the lighting system. However, if the governing body, prior to the presentation of the petition, has entered into any contract for the maintenance and operation of the system, it shall not be discontinued until the contract expires.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 409; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-409; W.S. 1977, § 15-6-611; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.